Maine, session 132, LD807.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §523, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 634, §8, is further
amended to read:
2. Disabled veterans; special free license plates. The Secretary of State, on
application and upon evidence of payment of the excise tax required by Title 36, section
1482 or upon evidence of exemption from excise tax under Title 36, section 1483,
subsection 12, shall issue, with no annual registration fee, a registration certificate and upon
request special designating plates to be used in lieu of regular registration plates for a
vehicle with a registered gross weight of not more than 26,000 pounds to any 100%
disabled veteran when that application is accompanied by certification from the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs or any branch of the United States Armed Forces as
to the veteran's permanent disability and receipt of 100% service-connected benefits. Upon
request a disability placard may be issued at no fee. The Secretary of State may issue a
registration certificate and special designating plates for no more than one vehicle 3
vehicles owned by a veteran eligible under this subsection.
These special designating plates must bear the words "Disabled Veteran," which indicate
that the vehicle is owned by a disabled veteran.
A municipality shall annually submit a report to the Secretary of State that includes the
number of registration certificates issued under this subsection to determine the excise tax
revenue annually lost. The Secretary of State shall notify the State Controller of the amount
of revenue to be reimbursed to each municipality. The State Controller shall transfer to
each municipality annually an amount based on the report for all registrations provided at
no cost by the municipality under this subsection.